Utah, session 2026, SB182.
Section 1. Section 17-72-411 is enacted to read:17-72-411. Attorney access to prisoners at a county jail.(1)Subject to Subsection (2), a sheriff shall allow an attorney to enter a jail under the sheriff's control for the purpose of meeting with a prisoner at the jail if the attorney:(a)is currently licensed in good standing by any state; and(b)informs the sheriff that the attorney wishes to meet with a prisoner who is at the jail.(2)An attorney may meet with a prisoner under Subsection (1) if the prisoner is:(a)the attorney's current or former client;(b)a prospective client and the meeting:(i)was requested by the prisoner, the prisoner's family, or by a person on behalf of the prisoner; or(ii)relates to potential representation for a civil rights matter;(c)a potential witness to a criminal case that the attorney is prosecuting or defending; or(d)an individual who may have information pertinent to a criminal case that the attorney is prosecuting or defending.(3)(a)Subject to Subsection (3)(b), a sheriff may designate another person at a jail under the sheriff's control to act on behalf of the sheriff for purposes of this section.(b)If a sheriff makes a designation under Subsection (3)(a), the sheriff shall provide the name of the designee on:(i)the sheriff's public website;(ii)the jail's website; and(iii)any other location that the sheriff determines would assist an attorney to locate the information.(c)A sheriff or a sheriff's designee may provide an online form or other method for an attorney to request:(i)a meeting under Subsection (1); or(ii)a meeting outside of the regular hours described in Subsection (4)(b).(4)A sheriff or a sheriff's designee:(a)shall provide a private and confidential space at the jail in which an attorney can meet with a prisoner; and(b)may require a meeting described in Subsection (1) to occur between 8 a.m. and 5 p.m., Monday through Friday, excluding holidays, unless:(i)the attorney presents special circumstances demonstrating that a meeting outside the days or times described in this Subsection (4)(b) is necessary:(A)to avoid a legal disadvantage or undue hardship to a prisoner or undue hardship to the attorney; or(B)in an emergency; and(ii)the sheriff or the sheriff's designee determines that the special circumstances presented under Subsection (4)(b)(i) are sufficient to warrant a meeting outside the days or times described in this Subsection (4)(b).(5)An attorney who meets with a prisoner under Subsection (1) and leaves discovery, evidence, or other documents with the prisoner shall ensure that the attorney complies with the requirements described in Subsection 17-72-301(3)(b).(6)Nothing in this section prevents an attorney from visiting a prisoner at a jail during normal visitation hours.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.